Texas statutes.
LOCAL GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 3. ORGANIZATION OF COUNTY GOVERNMENT

SUBTITLE B. COMMISSIONERS COURT AND COUNTY OFFICERS

CHAPTER 88. OFFICIAL BONDS OF COUNTY OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES

Sec. 88.001. CERTAIN BONDS PAYABLE TO COUNTY JUDGE; CUSTODY OF BONDS. The official bond of a county officer that is required by law to be approved by the commissioners court must, except as required by other law, be made payable to the county judge and kept and recorded by the county clerk.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 23, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 88.002. APPLICATION OF SURETY TO TERMINATE LIABILITY ON BOND. A surety on the official bond of a county officer may apply to the commissioners court to be relieved from the bond.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 23, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 88.003. NOTICE TO OFFICER OF SURETY'S APPLICATION. (a) The county clerk shall issue to the officer giving the bond a notice and a copy of a surety's application to be relieved from a bond.

(b) The sheriff or a constable of the county shall serve the notice and a copy of the application under this section on the officer.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 23, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 88.004. OFFICER TO STOP EXERCISING FUNCTIONS OF OFFICE. On service of notice under Section 88.003, an officer shall stop exercising the functions of the officer's office, except that:

(1) the officer shall preserve records and property in the officer's charge; and

(2) if the officer is a sheriff or constable, the officer shall:

(A) keep prisoners;

(B) preserve the peace; and

(C) execute warrants of arrest.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 23, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 88.005. OFFICER WHO FAILS TO GIVE NEW BOND VACATES OFFICE. An officer who does not give a new bond before the 21st day after the date the officer receives notice under Section 88.003 vacates the officer's office.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 23, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 88.006. NEW BOND; DISCHARGE OF FORMER SURETIES. If an officer served notice under Section 88.003 gives a new bond and the bond is approved, the former sureties are discharged from liability for misconduct of the officer after the approval of the new bond.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 23, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 88.007. NEW BOND REQUIRED BY COMMISSIONERS COURT. (a) A commissioners court that finds that a county officer's bond approved by the court is insufficient for any reason shall:

(1) require the officer to give a new bond or additional security; and

(2) have the officer cited to appear at a term of the court not earlier than the sixth day after the date of service and take any action the court considers best for the public interest.

(b) Action taken by the commissioners court under this section is final and may not be appealed.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 23, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 88.008. SELF-INSURANCE INSTEAD OF BOND. (a) Notwithstanding any other law requiring a county officer or employee to execute a bond as a condition of office or employment, a county officer or employee is not required to execute the bond and may perform the duties of office or employment if:

(1) the commissioners court by order authorizes the county to self-insure against losses that would have been covered by the bond; and

(2) the county judge approves the order adopted under Subdivision (1), if the county judge was required to approve the bond under the other law.

(b) An order adopted by the commissioners court under Subsection (a) shall be kept and recorded by the county clerk.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 69 (S.B. 265), Sec. 3, eff. May 18, 2013.